Wisconsin, session 2025, SB876.
do enact as follows:SB876,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB876,28Section 2. 20.445 (1) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:SB876,2,16920.445 (1) (bm) Workforce training; administration. Biennially, the amounts 10in the schedule for the administration of the local youth apprenticeship grant 11program under s. 106.13 (3m), the youth summer jobs program under s. 106.18, the 12employment transit assistance grant program under s. 106.26, the workforce 13training program programs under s. 106.27, the teacher development program 14grants under s. 106.272, the career and technical education incentive grant 15program under s. 106.273, the technical education equipment grant program under 16s. 106.275, and the apprentice programs under subch. I of ch. 106.SB876,317Section 3. 20.445 (1) (bp) of the statutes is created to read:SB876,2,201820.445 (1) (bp) Green jobs training program; grants. As a continuing 19appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for green jobs training program grants 20under s. 106.27 (1p).SB876,421Section 4. 106.27 (1p) of the statutes is created to read:SB876,2,2222106.27 (1p) Green jobs training program. (a) In this subsection:SB876,3,211. “Green jobs” means jobs that produce goods or provide services that benefit 2the environment, conserve natural resources, or create renewable energy resources.SB876,3,432. “Renewable energy resources” include hydroelectric, wood, wind, solar, 4refuse, agricultural, and biomass energy resources.SB876,3,95(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.445 (1) (bp), the department shall 6award grants to public or private organizations for the development and 7implementation of green jobs training programs. As a condition of receiving a grant 8under this subsection, the department may require a public or private organization 9to provide matching funds at a percentage to be determined by the department.SB876,510Section 5. 106.27 (2g) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB876,3,1311106.27 (2g) (a) 1. Promulgate rules prescribing procedures and criteria for 12awarding grants under sub. subs. (1) and (1p) and the information with respect to 13those grants that must be contained in the reports required under subd. 3.SB876,614Section 6. 106.27 (2g) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB876,3,1815106.27 (2g) (a) 2. Receive and review applications for grants under subs. (1), 16(1g), and (1j) (am), and (1p) and prescribe the form, nature, and extent of the 17information that must be contained in an application for a grant under sub. (1), (1g), 18or (1j) (am), or (1p).SB876,719Section 7. 106.27 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB876,4,1920106.27 (3) Annual report. Annually, by December 31, the department shall 21submit a report to the governor and the cochairpersons of the joint committee on 22finance providing an account of the department’s activities and expenditures under 23this section during the preceding fiscal year and detailing the amounts allocated to 1and expended for each of the programs, grants, and services specified in s. 20.445 2(1) (b) and, (bm), and (bp) for that fiscal year. The report shall include information 3on the number of unemployed and underemployed workers and incumbent 4employees who participate in training programs under sub. (1) or, (1j), or (1p); the 5number of unemployed workers who obtain gainful employment, underemployed 6workers who obtain new employment, and incumbent employees who receive 7increased compensation after participating in such a training program; and the 8wages earned by those workers and employees both before and after participating in 9such a training program. The report shall also include information on the extent to 10which waiting lists for enrollment in courses and programs provided by technical 11colleges in high-demand fields are reduced as a result of grants under sub. (1g) (a), 12on the number of students who participate in certification or training programs 13under sub. (1) (a) or (e) or (1g) (b), on the building modifications funded under sub. 14(1) (f) and the effect of those building modifications on the school districts’ technical 15education programs, and on the number of persons with disabilities who participate 16in employment enhancement activities under sub. (1g) (c). In addition, the report 17shall provide information on the number of student interns who are placed with 18employers as a result of the coordination activities conducted under sub. (1r) or the 19grants awarded under sub. (1) (d).SB876,820Section 8. Nonstatutory provisions.SB876,5,221(1) Position authorized. The authorized FTE positions for the department 22of workforce development are increased by 1.0 GPR position, to be funded from the 1appropriation under s. 20.445 (1) (bm), for the purpose of administering the green 2jobs training program under s. 106.27 (1p).SB876,5,113(2) Emergency rules. The department of workforce development may 4promulgate emergency rules under s. 227.24 necessary to implement s. 106.27 (1p). 5Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (c) and (2), emergency rules under this subsection 6remain in effect until July 1, 2027, or the date on which permanent rules take 7effect, whichever is sooner. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a) and (3), the 8department is not required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under this 9subsection as an emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of the public 10peace, health, safety, or welfare and is not required to provide a finding of 11emergency for a rule promulgated under this subsection.SB876,5,1212